North Carolina statutes. Chapter 74C. Private Protective Services.
Article 1. Private Protective Services Board.
§ 74C-17.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Enforcement.

The Board is authorized to apply in its own name to any judge of the superior court of the General Court of Justice for an injunction in order to prevent any violation or threatened violation of the provisions of this Chapter.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation or their agents and employees violating any of the provisions of this Chapter or knowingly violating any rule promulgated to implement this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Attorney General, or his representative, shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the district attorneys of this State to prosecute violations of this Chapter.

In lieu of revocation or suspension of a license or permit under

G.S. 74C-12

, a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) may be assessed by the Board against any person or business who violates any provision of this Chapter or any rule of the Board adopted pursuant to this Chapter. In determining the amount of any penalty, the Board shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Proceedings for the assessment of civil penalties under this section shall be governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the person assessed a civil penalty fails to pay the penalty to the Board, the Board may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the person resides or has his principal place of business to recover the unpaid amount of the penalty. An action to recover a civil penalty under this section shall not relieve any party from any other penalty prescribed by law.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 794, s. 6; 1989, c. 759, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 557; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 98.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Forty-Two Hundred Dollar Question: ‘May State Agencies Have Discretion in Setting Civil Penalties Under the North Carolina Constitution?’ ,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 1035 (1990).

§ 74C-17.
Enforcement.

The Board may apply in its own name to any judge of the superior court of the General Court of Justice for an injunction in order to prevent any violation or threatened violation of the provisions of this Chapter.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation or their agents and employees violating any of the provisions of this Chapter is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s representative, has concurrent jurisdiction with the district attorneys of this State to prosecute violations of this Chapter.

In lieu of revocation or suspension of a license or permit under

G.S. 74C-12

, a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) may be assessed by the Board against any person or business that violates any provision of this Chapter or any rule of the Board adopted pursuant to this Chapter. In determining the amount of any penalty, the Board shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Proceedings for the assessment of civil penalties under this section are governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the person assessed a civil penalty fails to pay the penalty to the Board, the Board may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the person resides or has a principal place of business to recover the unpaid amount of the penalty. An action to recover a civil penalty under this section does not relieve any party from any other penalty prescribed by law.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 794, s. 6; 1989, c. 759, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 557; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 98; 2021-84, s. 3.

§ 74C-18.
Reciprocity; temporary permit.

To the extent that other states which provide for licensing of any private protective services profession provide for similar action for citizens of this State, the Board, in its discretion, may grant a private protective services license to a nonresident who holds a valid private protective services license of the same type from another state upon satisfactory proof furnished to the Board that the standards of licensure in such other states are at least substantially equivalent to those prevailing in this State. Applicants shall make application to the Board on the form prescribed by the Board for all applicants, shall comply with the provisions of

G.S. 74C-10

, and shall pay the fees required of all applicants.

The Director, in his discretion and subject to the approval of the Board, may issue a temporary permit to a nonresident who has complied with the provisions of

G.S. 74C-10

and who is validly licensed in another state to engage in a private protective service activity incidental to a specific case originating in another state. A temporary permit may be issued for a period of no more than 30 days and may be renewed. A temporary permit may contain such restrictions which the Board, in its discretion, deems appropriate.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 67, s. 4; 1989, c. 759, s. 15; 2001-487, s. 64(j).

§ 74C-19.
Severability.

If any provision of this Chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is for any reason held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are declared to be severable.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2.

§ 74C-20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 673, s. 9.

§ 74C-21.
Law enforcement officer provisions.

No law enforcement officer of the United States, this State, any other state, or any political subdivision of a state shall be licensed as a private detective or security guard and patrol licensee under this Chapter.

An off-duty law enforcement officer may be employed during his off-duty hours by a licensed security guard and patrol company on an employer-employee basis. An off-duty law enforcement officer shall not wear his police officer’s uniform or use the police equipment while working for a security guard and patrol company.

A law enforcement officer may provide security guard and patrol services on an individual employer-employee basis to a person, firm, association, or corporation that is not engaged in a security guard and patrol profession.

History.

1989, c. 759, s. 16.

§ 74C-22.
Continuing education.

The Board may require individuals holding a license, registration, certificate, or permit to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal. The Board shall establish, by rule, the number of hours of continuing education necessary for renewal and any other requirements for completion of continuing education courses. The Board shall have the authority to approve continuing education courses and shall consider the continuing education course criteria, including the course curriculum, the qualifications of the instructor, the potential benefit to the industry, and any other criteria the Board deems appropriate.

History.

2007-511, s. 9.

§ 74C-23.
Acquisition or change of ownership or control of licensed firm, association, or corporation.

In the event a company, firm, or corporation licensed under this Chapter transfers ownership, control, or a majority of assets to another person, firm, association, or corporation, the person, firm, association, or corporation acquiring control or ownership shall have the following responsibilities:

Notify the Director of the acquisition or change of ownership or control by registered mail within five business days from the date of the transaction.

Describe the transaction that has occurred by providing the following information:

The name and address of the registered agent of the party acquiring control or ownership or otherwise succeeding the licensee.

The name and address of the acquiring party, including each individual owner of any interest in the party or, if the party is a corporation, the name and address of each officer of the corporation and member of the board of directors.

Any change in location of any branch office.

Any change in insurance or bonding limits.

Return to the Director all licenses held by the licensee within five business days from the date of the transaction if the acquiring party does not continue to operate the business under its previous name and license.

Provide to the Director within 60 calendar days from the date of the transaction the following:

A list of all registrants or licensees affected by the transaction.

Written confirmation of completion of any changes necessary for the acquiring party to comply with the requirements of this Chapter or any applicable rules adopted by the Board on a form approved by the Director.

History.

2009-328, s. 12.

§§ 74C-24 through 74C-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.